Utah statutes.
76-10-105.1.   Requirement of direct, face-to-face sale of tobacco products
-- Supremacy clause -- Penalties.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Cigarette" means a product which contains nicotine, is intended to be
burned under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of:
(i)  any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing
tobacco; or
(ii)  any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which,
because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its
packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers
as a cigarette described in Subsection (1)(a).
(b)  "Cigar" means a product which contains nicotine, is intended to be burned
under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of any roll of tobacco wrapped
in leaf tobacco, or in any substance containing tobacco, other than any roll
of tobacco which is a cigarette within the meaning of Subsection (1)(a).
(c)  "Cigarette tobacco" means a product that consists of loose tobacco that
contains or delivers nicotine and is intended for use by a consumer in a
cigarette.
(d)  "Pipe tobacco" means a product that consists of loose tobacco that
contains or delivers nicotine and is intended to be smoked by a consumer in a
pipe.
(e)  "Retailer" means a person who sells cigarettes, cigars, cigarette
tobacco, pipe tobacco, or smokeless tobacco to individuals for personal
consumption or who operates a facility where a vending machine or a self-
service display is permitted under Subsection (3)(b).
(f)  "Self-service display" means a display of cigarettes, cigars, cigarette
tobacco, pipe tobacco, or smokeless tobacco products to which the public has
access without the intervention of a retail employee.
(g)  "Smokeless tobacco" means a product that consists of cut, ground,
powdered, or leaf tobacco that contains nicotine and that is intended to be
placed in the oral cavity.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a retailer may sell cigarettes,
cigars, cigarette tobacco, pipe tobacco, and smokeless tobacco only in a
direct, face-to-face exchange between:
(i)  an employee of the retailer; and
(ii)  the purchaser.
(b)  Examples of methods that are not permitted include vending machines and
self-service displays.
(c)  Subsections (2)(a) and (b) do not prohibit the use or display of locked
cabinets containing cigarettes, cigars, cigarette tobacco, pipe tobacco, or
smokeless tobacco if the locked cabinets are accessible only to the retailer
or the retailer's employees.
(3)  The following sales are permitted as exceptions to Subsection (2):
(a)  mail-order sales, if the provisions of Section 59-14-509 are met;
(b)  sales from vending machines, including vending machines that sell
packaged, single cigarettes or cigars, and self-service displays that are
located in a separate and defined area within a facility where the retailer
ensures that no person younger than 19 years of age is present, or permitted
to enter, at any time, unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian; and
(c)  sales by a retailer from a retail store which derives at least 80% of its
revenue from tobacco and tobacco related products and where the retailer
ensures that no person younger than 19 years of age is present, or permitted
to enter at any time, unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.
(4)  Any ordinance, regulation, or rule adopted by the governing body of a
political subdivision of the state or by a state agency that affects the sale,
placement, or display of cigarettes, cigars, cigarette tobacco, pipe tobacco,
or smokeless tobacco that is not essentially identical to the provisions of
this section and Section 76-10-102 is superceded.
(5) (a)  A parent or legal guardian who accompanies a person younger than 19
years of age into an area described in Subsection (3)(b) or into a retail
store as described in Subsection (3)(c) and permits the person younger than 19
years of age to purchase or otherwise take a cigar, cigarette, or tobacco in
any form is guilty of providing tobacco as provided for in Section 76-10-104
and the penalties provided for in that section.
(b)  Nothing in this section may be construed as permitting a person to
provide tobacco to a minor in violation of Section 76-10-104.
(6)  Violation of Subsection (2) or (3) is a:
(a)  class C misdemeanor on the first offense;
(b)  class B misdemeanor on the second offense; and
(c)  class A misdemeanor on the third and all subsequent offenses.
